Illinois, session 104th, SB2054.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Child 5Welfare Disclosure to Parents and Caregivers Act. 6    Section 5. Parental rights; intact family and 7reunification services. It is the policy of this State that 8parents receiving intact family services or reunification 9services from the Illinois child welfare system have the 10following rights:11        (1) To be treated with dignity and respect and as a 12    valued member of the child welfare team.13        (2) To be provided a copy of this Act at the time of 14    case opening for intact family services or reunification 15    services. 16        (3) To be consulted about relative placement options 17    for their children prior to placement in a foster home. 18        (4) To be notified and considered as a placement 19    resource, as the noncustodial parent, prior to protective 20    custody. 21        (5) To not have financial means considered as a basis 22    for removal or reunification with their children. 23        (6) To be encouraged to participate in the development   SB2054- 2 -LRB104 12053 KTG 22148 b1    and amendment of their service plan.2        (7) To request amendments to their service plans.3        (8) To receive timely visitation with their children, 4    in accordance with all rules and procedures of the 5    Department of Children and Family Services, as well as 6    pursuant to orders from the court.7        (9) To have all cancelled or postponed parent/child 8    visitations rescheduled in a timely manner.9        (10) To have parent/child visits conducted in a 10    comfortable family-like setting. 11        (11) To request a child and family team meeting.12        (12) To be provided with their caseworker's 13    supervisor's contact information. 14        (13) To have all calls, email, and texts responded to 15    in a timely and professional manner. 16        (14) To have all meetings be scheduled at times and 17    places that allow parents to participate.18        (15) To be provided transportation assistance when 19    necessary to attend meetings and parent/child visits.20        (16) To receive direct communication from their 21    assigned attorney. 22        (17) To have in-person meetings with their assigned 23    attorney before every court hearing in a confidential 24    setting, prior to a hearing.25        (18) To be notified of and invited to attend all of 26    their child's medical appointments and school meetings.  SB2054- 3 -LRB104 12053 KTG 22148 b1        (19) To be permitted to communicate directly and 2    reasonably with their child's substitute caregiver for 3    purposes of helping caregivers to understand their child's 4    needs and to promote shared parenting, when feasible.5        (20) To participate in the development of the hair 6    care plan for their child.7        (21) To be free of retaliation when asserting a right 8    within this Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.